Missouri, session 2026, SB1151.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 191, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 191.1900, to read as
follows:
191.1900. 1. The provisions of this section shall be
known and may be cited as the "End Hospital
Institutionalization Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Boarding" or "boarded", any continued stay of a
medically stable patient in a hospital or emergency room
that occurs without medical justification because the
patient's caretaker is unable or unwilling to ensure:
(a) The safety, well-being, and necessary ongoing
medical, behavioral, or psychological care of the patient
outside the hospital; or
(b) The safety of the public with respect to the
patient's behaviors in the community outside the hospital;
(2) "Hospital", the same meaning given to the term in
section 197.020.
3. Upon notification by a hospital that a child under
the jurisdiction of a juvenile court is being boarded, the

SB 1151 2
juvenile court shall immediately intervene to ensure that
such child is placed in an appropriate setting and afforded
proper treatment.
4. Upon notification by a hospital that a child who is
not under the jurisdiction of a juvenile court is being
boarded, the juvenile court of the county in which the
hospital is located shall immediately take custody of the
child to ensure that such child is placed in an appropriate
setting and afforded proper treatment.
5. Upon notification by a hospital that an individual
who has been diagnosed with a developmental disability,
serious mental illness, or substance use disorder is being
boarded, the department of mental health shall provide case
management and treatment, including residential or inpatient
treatment as appropriate, without delay and in the least
restrictive environment possible.
6. The state shall reimburse the hospital the actual
costs for boarding, or the hospital's full allowable costs
under MO HealthNet rules, whichever is greater, for each day
an individual is boarded after the juvenile court or the
department of mental health has been notified of the
boarding of such individual.
✓